Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3305
Legal expense insurance; policy; certificate of coverage; issuance.

(1) Legal expense insurance may be written as individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance. Each contractual obligation for legal expense insurance shall be evidenced by a policy. Each person insured under a group policy shall be issued a certificate of coverage.

(2) No policy or certificate of legal expense insurance may be issued in this state unless a copy of the form has been filed with and approved by the director.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 5.